Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 1 Advisory Council for Probation

42-8-1.
[Reserved] Creation; composition; selection of members; terms of office.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 400, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 42/SB 340; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 2-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 42(1)/HB 323, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, in 2017, this Code section was designated as reserved.